Maryland, session 2025, HB0019.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
Subtitle 19. Maryland Loan Assistance Repayment Program for Nurses [and Nursing
Support Staff].
24–1901.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Education loan” means any loan that is obtained for tuition, educational
expenses, or living expenses for State certification, undergraduate, or graduate study
leading to practice as a nurse [or nursing support staff].
(c) “Fund” means the Maryland Loan Assistance Repayment Program Fund for
Nurses [and Nursing Support Staff].
(d) “Nurse” includes:
(1) An advanced practice registered nurse, as defined in § 8–101(b) of the
Health Occupations Article certified to practice as a nurse midwife or clinical nurse
specialist;
– 3 –

Ch. 416 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) A licensed practical nurse, as defined in § 8–101(h) of the Health
Occupations Article;
(3) A nurse anesthetist, as defined in § 8–101(k) of the Health Occupations
Article;
(4) A registered nurse, as defined in § 8–101(p) of the Health Occupations
Article; and
(5) A registered nurse practitioner, as defined in § 8–101(q) of the Health
Occupations Article.
(e) [“Nursing support staff” includes:
(1) A certified medication technician, as defined in § 8–6A–01(j) of the
Health Occupations Article;
(2) A certified medicine aide, as defined in § 8–6A–01(k) of the Health
Occupations Article;
(3) A certified nursing assistant, as defined in § 8–6A–01(l) of the Health
Occupations Article; and
(4) A geriatric nursing assistant, as defined in § 8–6A–01(o) of the Health
Occupations Article.
(f)] “Program” means the Maryland Loan Assistance Repayment Program for
Nurses [and Nursing Support Staff].
24–1902.
(a) (1) There is a Maryland Loan Assistance Repayment Program Fund for
Nurses [and Nursing Support Staff].
(2) The Fund is a continuing, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to §
7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(3) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(4) The Fund shall be invested and reinvested in the same manner as other
State funds.
(5) Any investment earnings of the Fund shall be paid into the Fund.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 416
(b) The Fund consists of:
(1) Revenue generated through a permanent funding structure
recommended to the General Assembly by a stakeholder workgroup convened by the
Department;
(2) Any available federal funds;
(3) Interest earnings; and
(4) Any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund.
(c) Expenditures from the Fund shall be made by an appropriation in the annual
State budget or by an approved budget amendment as provided under § 7–209 of the State
Finance and Procurement Article.
(d) The money in the Fund shall be used by the Office of the Comptroller to
administer the Program.
24–1903.
There is a Maryland Loan Assistance Repayment Program for Nurses [and Nursing
Support Staff].
24–1904.
(a) (1) In this section, “eligible field of employment” means [employment]:
(I) EMPLOYMENT by an organization, an institution, an
association, a society, or a corporation that is exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3) or (4)
of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; OR
(II) FOR–PROFIT EMPLOYMENT IN AN AREA OF THE STATE
IDENTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT AS HAVING A HEALTH CARE WORKFORCE
SHORTAGE OR PUBLIC HEALTH NEED.
(2) “Eligible field of employment” includes employment by the State or a
local government in the State.
(b) The Department shall use the Fund to assist in the repayment of the amount
of education loans owed by a nurse [or nursing support staff] who:
(1) Practices in an eligible field of employment; or
(2) Meets any other requirements established by the Department.
– 5 –

Ch. 416 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) Any unspent portions of the money that is transferred to the Department for
use under this subtitle may not be transferred to or revert to the General Fund of the State,
but shall remain in the Fund maintained by the Department to administer the Program.
24–1904.1.
(A) IN ADDITION TO THE ASSISTANCE PROVIDED UNDER § 24–1904 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, THE DEPARTMENT MAY, SUBJECT TO THE AVAILABILITY OF MONEY IN
THE FUND, ASSIST IN THE REPAYMENT OF AN EDUCATION LOAN OWED BY A NURSE
OR NURSING SUPPORT STAFF WHO:
(1) PRACTICES A MEDICAL SPECIALTY THAT HAS BEEN IDENTIFIED
BY THE DEPARTMENT AS BEING IN SHORTAGE IN THE GEOGRAPHIC AREA OF THE
STATE WHERE THE NURSE PRACTICES THAT SPECIALTY; AND
(2) COMMITS TO PRACTICING IN THE AREA FOR A PERIOD OF TIME
DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PRIORITIZE FUNDING FOR THE REPAYMENT
OF EDUCATION LOANS THROUGH THE PROGRAM IN THE FOLLOWING ORDER:
(1) NURSES OR NURSING SUPPORT STAFF WHO MEET THE
REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 24–1904(B)(1) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) NURSES OR NURSING SUPPORT STAFF PRACTICING IN PRIMARY
CARE IN A GEOGRAPHIC AREA WHERE THE DEPARTMENT HAS IDENTIFIED A
SHORTAGE OF NURSES OR NURSING SUPPORT STAFF; AND
(3) NURSES OR NURSING SUPPORT STAFF PRACTICING IN A MEDICAL
SPECIALTY OTHER THAN PRIMARY CARE IN A GEOGRAPHIC AREA WHERE THE
DEPARTMENT HAS IDENTIFIED A SHORTAGE OF THAT SPECIALTY.
24–1905.
The Department shall adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of this subtitle,
including regulations that:
(1) With advice from a stakeholder workgroup convened by the
Department, establish priorities for funding the repayment of education loans through the
Program;
(2) Establish the maximum number of participants in the Program each
year in each priority area established under item (1) of this section; and
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 416
(3) Establish the minimum and maximum amount of loan repayment
assistance awarded under this subtitle in each priority area established under item (1) of
this section.
24–1906.
On or before October 1, 2023, and each October 1 thereafter, the Department shall
report to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, on:
(1) The eligible nurses [and nursing support staff] who applied for the
Program, including information on:
(i) The practice of the nurse [or nursing support staff];
(ii) The type and location of the site in which the nurse [or nursing
support staff] provided services; and
(iii) The geographic area served by the nurse [or nursing support
staff]; and
(2) The nurses [and nursing support staff] who participated in the
Program, including information on:
(i) The amount of assistance provided to each participant;
(ii) The practice of the participant;
(iii) The type and location of the site in which the participant
provided services; and
(iv) The geographic area served by the participant.
Article – Health Occupations
8–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(D–1) (1) “ENTRY–LEVEL REGISTERED NURSING EDUCATION PROGRAM”
MEANS A REGISTERED NURSING EDUCATION PROGRAM THAT IS THE INITIAL ENTRY
POINT FOR FORMAL REGISTERED NURSING EDUCATION THAT, ON SUCCESSFUL
COMPLETION, QUALIFIES AN INDIVIDUAL WITH NO PRIOR REGISTERED NURSING
EDUCATION TO OBTAIN LICENSURE AS A REGISTERED NURSE.
– 7 –

Ch. 416 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) “ENTRY–LEVEL REGISTERED NURSING EDUCATION PROGRAM”
DOES NOT INCLUDE DEGREE COMPLETION PROGRAMS, INCLUDING:
(I) ASSOCIATE OF APPLIED SCIENCE DEGREE IN NURSING TO
BACCALAUREATE OF SCIENCE DEGREE IN NURSING (AAS–BSN);
(II) ASSOCIATE DEGREE IN NURSING TO BACCALAUREATE OF
SCIENCE DEGREE IN NURSING (ADN–BSN);
(III) ASSOCIATE OF APPLIED SCIENCE DEGREE IN NURSING TO
MASTER OF SCIENCE DEGREE IN NURSING (AAS–MSN);
(IV) ASSOCIATE DEGREE IN NURSING TO MASTER OF SCIENCE
DEGREE IN NURSING (ADN–MSN);
(V) BACCALAUREATE OF SCIENCE DEGREE IN NURSING TO
MASTER OF SCIENCE DEGREE IN NURSING (BSN–MSN);
(VI) BACCALAUREATE OF SCIENCE DEGREE IN NURSING TO
DOCTOR OF PHILOSOPHY (BSN–PHD);
(VII) BACCALAUREATE OF SCIENCE DEGREE IN NURSING TO
DOCTOR OF EDUCATION (BSN–EDD);
(VIII) BACCALAUREATE OF SCIENCE DEGREE IN NURSING TO
DOCTOR OF NURSING PRACTICE (BSN–DNP);
(IX) MASTER OF SCIENCE DEGREE IN NURSING TO DOCTOR OF
PHILOSOPHY (MSN–PHD);
(X) MASTER OF SCIENCE DEGREE IN NURSING TO DOCTOR OF
EDUCATION (MSN–EDD);
(XI) MASTER OF SCIENCE DEGREE IN NURSING TO DOCTOR OF
NURSING PRACTICE (MSN–DNP); AND
(XII) MASTER OF SCIENCE DEGREE IN NURSING TO POST
MASTERS CERTIFICATE/POST GRADUATE CERTIFICATE.
8–206.
(a) There is a Board of Nursing Fund.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 416
(e) (1) [(i)] The Board of Nursing Fund shall be used exclusively to cover the
actual documented direct and indirect costs of fulfilling the statutory and regulatory duties
of the Board as provided by the provisions of this title.
[(ii) The Board of Nursing Fund may not be used to pay for
infrastructure operations, as defined in § 1–203(b) of this article.]
8–302.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title, to qualify for a license, an applicant
shall be an individual who submits to a criminal history records check in accordance with
§ 8–303 of this subtitle and meets the requirements of this section.
(b) An applicant for a license to practice registered nursing shall complete
satisfactorily and meet all requirements for a diploma or degree from:
(1) [A] AN ENTRY–LEVEL registered nursing education program approved
by the Board; or
(2) An ENTRY–LEVEL REGISTERED NURSING education program [in
registered nursing] in any other state or country that the Board finds substantially
equivalent to the education program in this State at the time of the applicant’s graduation.
(c) An applicant for a license to practice licensed practical nursing shall:
(1) Meet all requirements for a high school diploma or its equivalent; and
(2) Complete satisfactorily and meet all requirements for a diploma from:
(i) A licensed practical nursing education program or its equivalent
approved by the Board; or
(ii) An education program in licensed practical nursing in any other
state or country that the Board finds substantially equivalent to the education program in
this State at the time of the applicant’s graduation.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in this title, the applicant shall pass an
examination developed by the National Council of State Boards of Nursing and
administered at a testing site approved by the National Council.
(e) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the Board shall require
as part of its examination or licensing procedures that an applicant for a license to practice
registered nursing or licensed practical nursing demonstrate a written and oral competency
in the English language.
– 9 –

Ch. 416 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) Acceptable proof of proficiency in the communication of the English
language under this section includes:
(i) After at least 3 years of enrollment, graduation from a recognized
English–speaking undergraduate school;
(ii) Graduation from a recognized English–speaking professional
school; or
(iii) Completion of at least 5 years of practicing nursing in another
state or English–speaking territory of the United States.
(3) If any disciplinary charge or action that involves a problem with
communicating in the English language is brought against a licensee under this title, the
Board shall require the licensee to take and pass a Board approved standardized test of
English language competency.
(4) The Board may not require that an applicant for a license to practice
registered nursing or licensed practical nursing who was previously licensed in any other
state to practice registered nursing or licensed practical nursing to demonstrate
competency in the English language as part of its examination or licensing procedures if
the other state has a similar English language competency component as part of its
examination or licensing procedures.
(5) (i) The Board may issue a temporary license to any applicant for a
license to practice registered nursing or licensed practical nursing who was previously
licensed in any other state to practice registered nursing or licensed practical nursing and
who, except for the competency in the English language component, is otherwise qualified
for a license.
(ii) A temporary license issued under this subsection is valid only
until the date when the next test to demonstrate competency in the English language is
given.
(f) An applicant for a license under this section shall be good moral character.
8–307.
(a) Subject to the provisions of this section, the Board may issue a license by
endorsement and waive any appropriate examination requirement of this title for an
applicant who has an active unencumbered license to practice registered nursing or
licensed practical nursing in any other state or country.
(b) The Board may issue a license by endorsement under this section only if the
applicant:
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 416
(1) Submits to the Board an application on the form that the Board
requires;
(2) Submits to a criminal history records check in accordance with § 8–303
of this subtitle;
(3) Pays the application fee set by the Board under § 8–304 of this subtitle;
and
(4) [Provides] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION, PROVIDES adequate evidence that:
(i) At the time the applicant graduated from a nursing education
program approved in the other state or country, the [applicant met the educational
qualifications then required by the laws of] PROGRAM WAS SUBSTANTIALLY
EQUIVALENT TO THE EDUCATION PROGRAM APPROVED IN this State;
(ii) At the time the applicant became licensed or registered in the
other state or country, the applicant passed in that or any other state or country an
examination that was similar to the examination that then was given in this State; and
(iii) The applicant meets the qualifications otherwise required by this
title.
(C) (1) AN APPLICANT FOR LICENSURE AS A REGISTERED NURSE BY
ENDORSEMENT WHO CANNOT PROVIDE THE EVIDENCE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B)(4)(I) OF THIS SECTION MAY QUALIFY FOR LICENSURE AS A
REGISTERED NURSE BY ENDORSEMENT IF THE APPLICANT MEETS THE
REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) AN APPLICANT MAY QUALIFY FOR LICENSURE AS A REGISTERED
NURSE BY ENDORSEMENT IF THE APPLICANT HAS:
(I) COMPLETED SATISFACTORILY AND MET ALL
REQUIREMENTS FOR AN ASSOCIATE OR A BACCALAUREATE DEGREE IN REGISTERED
NURSING FROM A COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY THAT, AT THE TIME OF THE APPLICANT’S
GRADUATION, IS:
1. ACCREDITED BY A NATIONAL OR REGIONAL NURSING
ACCREDITATION AGENCY THAT IS RECOGNIZED BY THE SECRETARY OF THE U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION OR THE COUNCIL FOR HIGHER EDUCATION
ACCREDITATION; AND
– 11 –

Ch. 416 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. APPROVED BY THE BOARD OF NURSING OR OTHER
APPLICABLE STATE REGULATOR IN THE STATE IN WHICH THE PROGRAM IS
LOCATED; AND
(II) COMPLETED A MINIMUM NUMBER OF DIRECT PATIENT
CARE PRACTICE HOURS AS REQUIRED BY REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE BOARD.
8–6A–14.
(a) The Board, in conjunction with the Maryland Higher Education Commission,
shall approve each nursing assistant training program prior to its implementation and
provide periodic survey of all programs in the State.
(b) The Board in conjunction with the Department, Maryland Higher Education
Commission, and the affected industry shall develop regulations for nursing assistant
training programs.
(c) The curriculum content for an approved nursing assistant training program
shall include:
(1) Content consistent with State licensing requirements in the Health –
General Article and all federal requirements;
(2) All basic skills required of a nursing assistant regardless of the setting
of the practice; and
(3) Any skills required for certification in a specific category.
(d) Any additional clinical practice skills specific to a setting of practice shall be
taught in that setting as a part of the employment training process in that setting.
(e) The Board may make survey visits from time to time, without prior notice, to
all certified nursing assistant training programs.
(f) The provisions of this section may not be interpreted to impose additional
requirements for geriatric nursing assistants beyond those required under federal law.
[(g) The Board shall approve the use of a nursing assistant training site by a
nursing assistant training program within 45 days after the nursing assistant training
program applies for approval if the nursing assistant training program had previously been
approved to use the training site by the Board.]
8–6B–30.
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 416
Subject to the evaluation and reestablishment provisions of the Maryland Program
Evaluation Act, and subject to the termination of this title under § 8–802 of this title, this
subtitle and all rules and regulations adopted under this subtitle shall terminate and be of
no effect after July 1, [2025] 2030.
8–6C–26.
Subject to the evaluation and reestablishment provisions of the Maryland Program
Evaluation Act, and subject to the termination of this subtitle under § 8–802 of this title,
this subtitle and all regulations adopted under this subtitle shall terminate and be of no
effect after July 1, [2025] 2030.
8–802.
Subject to the evaluation and reestablishment provisions of the Program Evaluation
Act, the provisions of this title and of any rule or regulation adopted under this title shall
terminate and be of no effect after July 1, [2025] 2030.
Article – Tax – General
10–739.
(b) (1) Subject to the limitations of this section, a nurse practitioner or licensed
physician may claim a credit against the State income tax in the amount stated on the tax
credit certificate issued under subsection (c) of this section for the taxable year in which
the nurse practitioner or licensed physician served without compensation as a preceptor in
a preceptorship program approved by the State Board of Nursing and worked:
(i) a minimum of three rotations, each consisting of at least 100 90
hours of community–based clinical training; and
(ii) in an area of the State identified as having a health care
workforce shortage by the Department, in consultation with the Governor’s Workforce
Development Board.
10–739.1.
(b) (1) Subject to the limitations of this section, a licensed practical nurse,
advanced practice registered nurse, or registered nurse may claim a credit against the State
income tax in the amount stated on the tax credit certificate issued under subsection (c) of
this section for the taxable year in which the licensed practical nurse, advanced practice
registered nurse, or registered nurse served without compensation as a preceptor in a
preceptorship program approved by the State Board of Nursing and worked:
(i) a minimum of three rotations, each consisting of at least 100 90
hours of community–based clinical training; and
– 13 –

Ch. 416 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) in an area of the State identified as having a health care
workforce shortage by the Department, in consultation with the Governor’s Workforce
Development Board.
Chapter 385 of the Acts of 2016, as amended by Chapters 153 and 154 of the Acts
of 2021
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2016, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2015. It
shall remain effective for a period of [10] 14 years and, at the end of June 30, [2026] 2030,
with no further action required by the General Assembly, this Act shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Chapter 386 of the Acts of 2016, as amended by Chapters 153 and 154 of the Acts
of 2021
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2016, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2015. It
shall remain effective for a period of [10] 14 years and, at the end of June 30, [2026] 2030,
with no further action required by the General Assembly, this Act shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Chapter 675 of the Acts of 2022
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect July 1, 2022, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December
31, 2021, but before January 1, [2025] 2030. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective for
a period of 3 years and, at the end of June 30, [2025] 2030, Section 2 of this Act, with no
further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force
and effect.
Chapter 222 of the Acts of 2023
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective through June 30, [2025] 2030, and, at
the end of June 30, [2025] 2030, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required by
the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Chapter 223 of the Acts of 2023
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 416
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective through June 30, [2025] 2030, and, at
the end of June 30, [2025] 2030, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required by
the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Chapter 818 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before June JANUARY
1, [2025] 2026, the State Board of Nursing shall:
(1) notify individuals who possess a nursing assistant certification of the
licensing requirements established under Section 1 of this Act; and
(2) in consultation with the Office of Health Care Quality, update
regulations to conform with Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall take
effect October APRIL 1, [2025] 2026.
Chapter 819 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before June JANUARY
1, [2025] 2026, the State Board of Nursing shall:
(1) notify individuals who possess a nursing assistant certification of the
licensing requirements established under Section 1 of this Act; and
(2) in consultation with the Office of Health Care Quality, update
regulations to conform with Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall take
effect October APRIL 1, [2025] 2026.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
8–6A–01.
(n) (2) “Certified nursing assistant–I” includes:
(i) A certified nursing assistant who was certified as a geriatric
nursing assistant on [September 30, 2025] MARCH 31, 2026;
– 15 –

Ch. 416 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) A certified medicine aide; and
(iii) A certified nursing assistant who is approved under §
8–6A–05(c)(5) of this subtitle.
(o) “Certified nursing assistant–II” means a certified nursing assistant:
(1) Who, on [September 30, 2025] MARCH 31, 2026, was certified as a
nursing assistant and was not authorized to practice in a nursing facility or skilled nursing
facility; and
(2) Whose authority to practice in a nursing facility or skilled nursing
facility continues to be restricted because the certified nursing assistant has not been
approved as a certified nursing assistant–I under § 8–6A–05(c)(5) of this subtitle.
8–6A–05.
(c) (5) Beginning [October 1, 2025] APRIL 1, 2026, a certified nursing
assistant–II may be certified as a certified nursing assistant–I by:
(i) Submitting an application to the Board on the form that the
Board requires; and
(ii) Providing satisfactory evidence of:
1. Successful completion of an approved nursing assistant
training program; and
2. Passing a nursing assistant competency evaluation.
8–6A–07.
(c) An individual who has met the requirements for a certified nursing assistant
on or after [October 1, 2025] APRIL 1, 2026, shall be certified with the title of “certified
nursing assistant–I”.
8–6A–14.
[(g) (1) The Board shall approve the use of a nursing assistant training site by
a nursing assistant training program within 45 days after the nursing assistant training
program applies for approval if the nursing assistant training program had previously been
approved to use the training site by the Board.
(2) A nursing assistant training program under paragraph (1) of this
subsection may continue to operate during the approval process.]
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 416
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect October 1, 2025, the effective date of Chapters 818 and 819 of the Acts of the General
Assembly of 2024. If the effective date of Chapters 818 and 819 is amended, Section 2 of
this Act shall take effect on the taking effect of Chapters 818 and 819.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to the provisions of
Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall take effect June 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 17 –